Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-107
Shelterbelts; no expenditures authorized.

Sections 72-105 to 72-107 shall not be construed to authorize the Board of Educational Lands and Funds to spend any funds which may be under its jurisdiction, nor to incur indebtedness, under the above-mentioned agreements.

Laws 1935, c. 144, § 3, p. 538;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-110;

R.S.1943, § 72-107.